Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.900

Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Nonprofit Miscellaneous and Mutual Corporation Act".

[ 1982 c 35 s 163; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 104.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.